Colorado statutes. TITLE 40 Utilities
PART 5
TELECOMMUNICATIONS POLICY AND PLANNING

Law reviews:

For article, "Telecommunications

C

hanges: State Opens Local Exchange Service to

C

ompetition", see 24 Colo. Law. 2147 (1995).

40-15-501. Legislative declaration - purpose and scope of part.

The general assembly hereby finds, determines, and declares that competition in the market for basic local exchange service will increase the choices available to customers and reduce the costs of such service. Accordingly, it is the policy of the state of Colorado to encourage competition in this market and strive to ensure that all consumers benefit from such increased competition. The commission is encouraged, where competition is not immediately possible, to utilize other interim marketplace mechanisms wherever possible, with the ultimate goal of replacing the regulatory framework established in part 2 of this article with a fully competitive telecommunications marketplace statewide as contemplated in this part 5.

The general assembly further finds, determines, and declares that:

Wise public policy relating to the telecommunications industry and the other crucial services it provides is in the interest of Colorado and its citizens;

Sound and well-informed decisions need to be made on a continuing basis to ensure that the benefits of existing and new telecommunications services continue to be available to the greatest number of Colorado citizens;

The involvement of telecommunications providers and others with experience and expertise in the area of telecommunications is essential to keep legislators informed of developing technology and evolving markets, thus to avoid costly errors and enhance the efficiency of the state's growing telecommunications network; and

The rural nature of Colorado requires that special rules and support mechanisms be adopted to achieve the goal of ensuring that universal basic local exchange service be available to all residents of the state at reasonable rates. Rules adopted by the commission under this part 5 shall be designed to achieve this goal.

This part 5 is enacted for the following purposes:

To set forth, in concise fashion, the policy of this state in specific subject matter areas within the general topic of telecommunications, both for the guidance of the commission in carrying out its duties under this article and for the information of the citizens of Colorado;

To create a framework for the identification of other subject matter areas should the need arise, the formulation of suggested policies in areas in which a policy direction has not yet been stated, and the reaching of consensus, wherever possible, among parties affected by such policies so as to minimize conflicts, ease the commission's considerable workload, and enhance the efficient delivery of telecommunications services to the public; and

To adapt the regulatory structure of parts 2, 3, and 4 of this article to accommodate multiple providers of telecommunications services and to permit alternate forms of regulation for providers of local exchange service.

Source:

L. 95:

Entire part added, p. 746, § 1, effective May 24.

L. 2014:

(3)(c) amended, (HB 14-1331), ch. 152, p. 529, § 10, effective May 9.

40-15-502. Expressions of state policy.

Competitive local exchange market. Local exchange telecommunications markets shall be open to competition, under conditions determined by the commission by rule pursuant to this part 5, on or before July 1, 1996.

Basic service. Basic service is the availability of high quality, minimum elements of local exchange telecommunications service, as defined by the commission, at just, reasonable, and affordable rates to all people of the state of Colorado. The commission shall conduct a proceeding no less frequently than every three years to consider the revision of the definition of basic service, with the goal that every citizen of this state shall have access to a wider range of services at rates that are reasonably comparable as between urban and rural areas.

Universal basic service - affordability of basic service.

The commission shall require the furtherance of universal basic service, toward the ultimate goal that basic service be available and affordable to all citizens of the state of Colorado. The general assembly acknowledges the use of low-income telephone assistance programs, including "life-line" and "link-up", and telecommunications relay services for disabled telephone users to further the goal of universal service. The commission may regulate providers of telecommunications services to the extent necessary to assure that universal basic service is available to all consumers in the state at fair, just, and reasonable rates.

Consistent with the public interest goal of maintaining affordable, just, and reasonably priced basic local exchange service for all citizens of the state, the commission shall structure telecommunications regulation to achieve a transition to a fully competitive telecommunications market with the policy that prices for residential basic local exchange service, including zone charges, if any, do not rise above the levels determined by the commission.

Shall consider the changes since May 24, 1995, in the costs of providing such service;

Shall consider the changes since May 24, 1995, in the nationwide average price for comparable service;

Shall consider flexible-pricing tariff options; and

May, for any affected provider, consider the net revenues derived from other services regulated under part 2 or 3 of this article, with the exception of switched access service, notwithstanding any provision of section 40-15-201 to the contrary. Nothing in this sub-subparagraph (D) shall permit the commission to limit the affected provider's overall rate of return or overall revenues when determining the appropriate maximum price for residential basic service for that provider.

The commission may delay or deny a price increase for residential basic service if a provider is in substantial violation of the commission's rules governing quality of service or held service orders.

This section shall not be construed to prohibit the commission from granting an increase in residential basic local exchange service rates for local exchange carriers under rate-of-return regulation if such increase was approved before May 24, 1995, or if, and to the extent that, such increase is necessary to recover a provider's costs associated with investments for network upgrades made for the purpose of provisioning residential basic local exchange service if such investments are approved or required by the commission and not previously included in the calculation of residential basic local exchange service rates.

For service provided to residential customers outside the base rate area of a local exchange provider, the commission shall limit rate increases to maintain rates at affordable levels and shall employ universal service funding mechanisms as contemplated in subsection (5) of this section to compensate for the high cost of serving such customers in preference to allowing rate increases.

If there are areas within a provider's base rate area, as determined by the commission, that are receiving subsidies, those areas may continue to receive subsidies or be eligible for funding under the universal service support funding mechanisms at the commission's discretion.

If and when additional elements are included in the definition of basic service as a result of review by the commission under subsection (2) of this section, prices may increase as is reasonably necessary to cover the cost and account for the inclusion of such additional elements.

(I.5) In determining the appropriate maximum price for residential basic service for each regulated provider, the commission:

Universal access to advanced service. The general assembly acknowledges the goal of universal access to advanced service to all citizens of this state. The commission shall consider the impact of opening entry to the local exchange market and shall determine whether additional support mechanisms may be necessary to promote this goal if competition for local exchange services fails to deliver advanced services in all areas of the state.

Universal service support mechanisms.

In order to accomplish the goals of universal basic service, universal access to advanced service under section 24-37.5-119, and any revision of the definition of basic service under subsection (2) of this section, the commission shall create a system of support mechanisms to assist in the provision of basic service and advanced service in high-cost areas. The commission shall fund these support mechanisms equitably and on a nondiscriminatory, competitively neutral basis through assessments, which may include a rate element, on all telecommunications providers in Colorado. A provider's eligibility to receive support for basic service under the support mechanisms is conditioned upon the provider's offering basic service throughout an entire support area.

A provider that offers basic local exchange service throughout an entire support area through use of its own facilities or on a resale basis may be qualified as a provider of last resort.

A provider that fails to pay an assessment due and payable under paragraph (a) of this subsection (5) shall have its certificate revoked after notice and the opportunity for a hearing as provided in article 6 of this title.

Provider of last resort - duty to follow evolving definition of basic service.

In all relevant geographic areas of the state, as defined by the commission, the commission shall designate at least one provider as the provider of last resort and adopt procedures for changing or terminating such designations. A provider of last resort designation carries the responsibility to offer basic local exchange service to all consumers who request it.

A person holding a certificate of public convenience and necessity to provide basic service shall be subject to the evolving definition of basic service developed by the commission under subsection (2) of this section and the system of financial support for universal service established by the commission under subsection (5) of this section.

Barriers to entry. It is the policy of this state that all barriers to entry into the provision of telecommunications services in Colorado be removed as soon as is practicable, subject to the commission's authority to ensure quality of service and other matters as provided in this article.

Source:

L. 95:

Entire part added, p. 747, § 1, effective May 24.

L. 98:

(5)(a) amended, p. 705, § 2, effective July 1.

L. 2008:

(3)(b)(I) amended and (3)(b)(I.5) added, p. 1805, § 27, effective July 1.

L. 2014:

(2), (3)(a), (3)(b)(I), (3)(b)(IV)(B), and (4) amended, (HB 14-1330), ch. 151, p. 519, § 6, effective May 9; (5)(a) amended (HB 14-1331), ch. 152, p. 529, § 11, effective May 9; (5)(a) amended (HB 14-1328), ch. 173, p. 632, § 3, effective May 10.

L. 2018:

(5)(a) and (5)(b) amended, (SB 18-002), ch. 89, p. 709, § 3, effective August 8.

L. 2021:

(5)(a) amended, (HB 21-1109), ch. 489, p. 3528, § 8, effective July 7.

Editor's note:

Amendments to subsection (5)(a) by HB 14-1331 and HB 14-1328 were harmonized.

40-15-503. Opening of competitive local exchange market - process of negotiation and rule-making - issues to be considered by commission - definition.

Repealed.

and

Repealed.

The commission shall consider changing to forms of price regulation other than rate-of-return regulation for any telecommunications provider that provides services regulated under part 2 or 3 of this article and shall consider the conditions under which such a change may take place to ensure that telecommunications services continue to be available to all consumers in the state at fair, just, and reasonable rates. This paragraph (c) shall not be construed to limit the manner and methods of regulation available under section 40-15-302.

As used in this paragraph (c), "price regulation" means a form of regulation that may contain, without limitation, any of the following elements:

Regulation of the price and quality of services;

Price floors and price ceilings;

Flexibility in pricing between price floors and price ceilings;

Modified tariff requirements;

Incentives for increased efficiency, productivity, and quality of service.

The commission shall adopt rules providing for simplified regulatory treatment for rural telecommunications providers as defined in section 40-15-102 (24.5). Such simplified treatment may include, but shall not be limited to, optional methods of regulatory treatment that reduce regulatory requirements, reduce the financial burden of regulation, and allow pricing flexibility. Such simplified treatment may also allow extensions of time for the implementation of requirements under this part 5 in rural exchanges for which there are no competing basic local exchange providers certified.

Applications for certificates of public convenience and necessity to provide basic local exchange service may be filed with the commission at any time. A person that, on or before January 1, 1995, held a certificate of public convenience and necessity to provide basic local exchange service under part 2 of this article and who still holds the certificate need not reapply to the commission for additional or continued authority. A provider of local exchange services shall not operate in this state without a certificate of public convenience and necessity.

A telecommunications provider that is granted a certificate of public convenience and necessity to provide local exchange telecommunications service in competition with an incumbent provider of local exchange service shall be regulated under part 3 of this article unless the commission determines that the services of such provider are not subject to effective competition from the incumbent local exchange provider.

to (III) Repealed.

(IV) (A) Repealed.

(B) In adopting commission tariffs, the commission shall determine whether the rates, terms, and conditions of sale to be set forth in such tariffs are based on cost and are nondiscriminatory. Such rates, terms, and conditions of sale may include a reasonable profit.

(V) As used in this paragraph (g), "true-up" means recovery of the difference between:

(A) The rates paid under temporary interim tariffs before the adoption of commission tariffs or, if interconnection agreements as contemplated in subparagraph (III) of this paragraph (g) are in effect, the rates paid under temporary interim tariffs before the effective dates of such agreements; and

(B) The rates that would have been paid during the same time period had the commission tariffs or interconnection agreements been in effect instead of such temporary interim tariffs.

(VI) True-up shall be accomplished by means of lump-sum cash payments unless the commission orders another method of payment. If the commission orders a refund or an additional payment to be made at the time of true-up, such refund or additional payment shall be paid with interest at a rate to be determined by the commission.

(VII) Repealed.

(VIII) In all proceedings initiated pursuant to this paragraph (g), the burden of proof shall be on the telecommunications service provider.

(IX) The following entities shall be exempt from the requirements of this paragraph (g):

(A) A basic local exchange provider that serves only rural exchanges of ten thousand or fewer access lines;

(B) As to the interim rates, a college or vocational school as defined in section 23-3-103, C.R.S.

The commission shall require by rule that any telecommunications service provider required to file temporary interim tariffs and, to the extent such a requirement is permissible under federal law, any basic local exchange provider that serves only rural exchanges of ten thousand or fewer access lines and that has received a bona fide request for interconnection shall file advice letters with the commission to place into effect temporary interim tariffs and commission tariffs for unbundled facilities or functions, interconnection, services for resale, or local number portability by such dates certain as the commission may determine by rule.

During the period of negotiation and rule-making as contemplated in this section, the director of the commission may request, on a case-by-case basis, and the commission may grant, extensions to the statutorily directed times for completion of proceedings before the commission; except that no such extension shall be requested for proceedings under this section. During rule-making under this section, the commission may, on its own motion and on a case-by-case basis, grant such extensions; except that no such extension shall be granted for proceedings under this section.

Source:

L. 95:

Entire part added, p. 750, § 1, effective May 24.

L. 96:

(2)(g) and (2)(h) added, p. 706, § 1, effective May 15.

L. 2000:

(2)(d) amended, p. 48, § 7, effective March 10.

L. 2013:

(2)(b)(V) amended, (HB 13-1300), ch. 316, p. 1708, § 133, effective August 7.

L. 2014:

(1), (2)(a), (2)(b), (2)(g)(I), (2)(g)(II), (2)(g)(III), (2)(g)(IV)(A), and (2)(g)(VII) repealed and (2)(e) amended, (HB 14-1330), ch. 151, p. 520, § 7, effective May 9.

L. 2019:

(2)(h) amended, (SB 19-236), ch. 359, p. 3316, § 24, effective May 30.

40-15-503.5. Financial assurance - rules.

The commission may require regulated telecommunications service providers to post a bond or provide other security as a condition of obtaining a certificate, registration, or operating authority, whichever instrument or instruments apply. In setting the amount of the bond or security, the commission may consider the following criteria:

The financial viability of the service provider, as evidenced by its audited financial statements and its general credit history;

The total amount of deposits made by customers to the provider to obtain service and the aggregate amount of prepayments made by customers for monthly regulated service; and

The history of the provider's statutory payment obligations, including those to the Colorado high cost support mechanism, the Colorado telephone relay system, and the Colorado telecommunications utility fund.

The commission may promulgate rules to implement this section and may impose additional criteria consistent with this section.

Source:

L. 2003:

Entire section added, p. 1700, § 7, effective May 14.

L. 2013:

(1)(c) amended, (SB 13-194), ch. 89, p. 289, § 3, effective April 1.

L. 2019:

(1)(c) amended, (SB 19-236), ch. 359, p. 3316, § 25, effective May 30.

40-15-504. Working support group - duties - composition - repeal. (Repealed)

Source:

L. 95:

Entire part added, p. 752, § 1, effective May 24.

Editor's note:

Subsection (4) provided for the repeal of this section, effective July 1, 1997. (See L. 95, p. 752.)

40-15-505. Committee on telecommunications policy - creation - duties - repeal. (Repealed)

Source:

L. 95:

Entire part added, p. 753, § 1, effective May 24.

Editor's note:

Subsection (5) provided for the repeal of this section, effective July 1, 1997. (See L. 95, p. 753.)

40-15-506. Advisory committee to committee on telecommunications policy - creation - duties - repeal. (Repealed)

Source:

L. 95:

Entire part added, p. 754, § 1, effective May 24.

Editor's note:

Subsection (3) provided for the repeal of this section, effective July 1, 1997. (See L. 95, p. 754.)

40-15-507. Funding and appropriations - telecommunications policy development fund - creation - repeal. (Repealed)

Source:

L. 95:

Entire part added, p. 754, § 1, effective May 24.

Editor's note:

Subsection (2) provided for the repeal of this section, effective July 1, 1996. (See L. 95, p. 754.)

40-15-508. Local exchange administration fund - repeal. (Repealed)

Source:

L. 95:

Entire part added, p. 755, § 1, effective May 24.

Editor's note:

Subsection (2) provided for the repeal of this section, effective July 1, 1999. (See L. 95, p. 755.)

40-15-509. Transfer of certificate.

Any certificate of public convenience and necessity to provide local exchange service may be sold, assigned, leased, encumbered, or transferred as other property only upon authorization by the commission.

Source:

L. 95:

Entire part added, p. 755, § 1, effective May 24.

40-15-509.5. Broadband service - report - broadband deployment board - broadband administrative fund - creation - definitions - rules - repeal. (Repealed)

Source:

L. 2014:

Entire section added, (HB 14-1328), ch. 173, p. 632, § 4, effective May 10.

L. 2016:

(4)(a) amended, (HB 16-1184), ch. 77, p. 200, § 1, effective January 1, 2017.

L. 2017:

(3), (4)(a), and IP(8) amended, (SB 17-306), ch. 365, p. 1907, § 1, effective June 6.

L. 2018:

(10.5) added, (HB 18-1116), ch. 2, p. 24, § 1, effective January 29; (3), (5)(a), (5)(b), IP(5)(c), (5)(c)(II)(C), (5)(c)(III), (5)(c)(IV), (5)(f), (7), IP(8), (8)(a), (8)(c), (8)(d)(I), (8)(e), (8)(j), IP(9)(a), and (11) amended, (4)(b) and (6) repealed, and (5)(g), (8)(c.5), (8.5), (10.7), and (10.9) added, (SB 18-002), ch. 89, p. 710, § 4, effective August 8; (8)(g) amended, (HB 18-1099), ch. 92, p. 731, § 1, effective August 8; (10.6) added, (SB 18-104), ch. 93, p. 734, § 2, effective August 8.

L. 2019:

(8.3) added, (SB 19-078), ch. 210, p. 2215, § 2, effective May 17.

L. 2020:

IP(8), (8)(a), and (8)(b) amended, (HB 20-1137), ch. 241, p. 1162, § 2, effective September 14.

L. 2021:

Entire section repealed, (HB 21-1109), ch. 489, p. 3528, § 9, effective July 7.

40-15-510. Violations.

Violations of this part 5 by a telecommunications provider are subject to enforcement and penalties as provided in article 7 of this title.

Source:

L. 95:

Entire part added, p. 755, § 1, effective May 24.